Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.240

State and local government bond information—Validity of bonds not affected.

Failure to file the information required by RCW 39.44.210 and 39.44.230 shall not affect the validity of the bonds that are issued.

[ 1989 c 225 s 4; 1985 c 130 s 4.]